Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.09
Securities deposited under former law; treatment.

All securities now held on deposit by the director, which were made pursuant to any prior insurance law, shall be deemed to be held in compliance with the provisions of sections 44-319.01 to 44-319.13, for the purpose for which such deposits were originally made.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 9, p. 500.